Utah statutes.
65A-8-208.   Presuppression costs -- Disbursements from fund -- Credit against assessment -- Limited by appropriation.

(1)  The state forester or the state forester's authorized representative may make disbursements from the Wildland Fire Suppression Fund to pay for costs of presuppression and fire management activities initiated by counties participating in the fund, subject to the limitations specified in this section.

(2)  Payments to a county for costs of presuppression and fire management activities in any year may not exceed the county's assessment under Subsection 65A-8-205(2)(a).

(3) (a)  In lieu of making a disbursement from the fund for a county's costs of presuppression and fire management activities, the county may be given a credit against its assessment under Subsection 65A-8-205(2)(a) equal to those costs.

(b)  The credit may not exceed the county's assessment under Subsection 65A-8-205(2)(a).

(4)  The total amount of money in the fund that may be allocated to cover costs of presuppression and fire management activities initiated by counties may not exceed the legislative appropriation to the fund for those costs.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 136, 2007 General Session

